Nebraska, session 109, LB424.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB424 LB424
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Allowable growth percentage means the lesser of:
(i) The inflation rate; or
(ii) Three percent;
(b) Inflation rate means the percentage change in the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers, as prepared by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the twelve-month
period ending on August 31 of the year in which the property tax bill is
determined; and
(c) Property tax bill means the amount of property taxes due for a
parcel of real property as shown on the property tax statement for such
parcel.
(2) The property tax bill for any parcel of real property shall not
exceed the prior year's property tax bill by more than the allowable
growth percentage.
(3) This section shall not apply if the increase in a property tax
bill is due to improvements made to the relevant parcel of real property.
-2-